North Carolina, session 2025, SB48.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-407.55(1)b. reads as rewritten:
"b. Enrollment and transfer requirements, including the following:
…
3. If a public high school does not offer a particular sport, a
student from that school may participate in the sport at the
public high school closest to the student's school that has a
program in that sport, subject to the terms and conditions
applicable to a regularly enrolled member of that high school's
student body, except that the high school may charge a
reasonable fee for participation to a student who is not enrolled
in the high school as established by the local board of education
in accordance with G.S. 115C-47(6).
4. A private school or home school student may participate in a
sport at the base public high school for the student's address,
subject to the terms and conditions applicable to a regularly
enrolled member of that high school's student body. If the
student's base public high school does not have a program in a
particular sport, the student may participate in the sport at the
public high school closest to the student's base public high
school that has a program in that sport, subject to the terms and
conditions applicable to a regularly enrolled member of that
high school's student body. The public high school may charge
a reasonable fee for participation to a student who is not
enrolled in the high school as established by the local board of
education in accordance with G.S. 115C-47(6)."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-47(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) To Regulate Fees, Charges and Solicitations. – Local boards of education shall
adopt rules and regulations governing solicitations of, sales to, and
fund-raising activities conducted by, the students and faculty members in
schools under their jurisdiction, and no fees, charges, or costs shall be
*S48-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
collected from students and school personnel without approval of the board of
education as recorded in the minutes of said board; provided, this subdivision
shall not apply to such textbooks fees as are determined and established by the
State Board of Education. The local board of education shall publish a
schedule of fees, charges, and solicitations approved by the local board board,
including fees established to allow students not enrolled in a particular public
high school to participate in sports and other extracurricular activities, on the
local school administrative unit's Web site by October 15 of each school year
and, if the schedule is subsequently revised, within 30 days following the
revision."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 48-First Edition